Hawaii statutes.
[§431:4-244] Filing of information required
by schedule B. (a) No solicitation shall be made by any person, other
than the management of an insurer unless at least five business days prior
thereto or a shorter period as the commissioner may authorize upon a showing of
good cause, there has been filed, with the commissioner, by or on behalf of
each participant in the solicitation, a statement in duplicate containing the
information specified in schedule B pursuant to section 431:4-233 and a copy of
any material proposed to be distributed to stockholders in furtherance of the
solicitation. Where preliminary copies of any materials are filed,
distribution to stockholders shall be deferred until the commissioner's
comments have been received and complied with.

(b) Within five business days after a
solicitation is made by the management of an insurer, or a longer period as the
commissioner may authorize upon a showing of good cause, there shall be filed
with the commissioner by or on behalf of each participant in the solicitation,
other than the insurer and by or on behalf of each management nominee or
director, a statement in duplicate containing the information specified by
schedule B under section 431:4-233.

(c) If any solicitation on behalf of the management
or any other person has been made, or if proxy material is ready for
distribution, prior to a solicitation in opposition thereto, a statement in
duplicate containing the information specified in schedule B shall be filed
with the commissioner, by or on behalf of each participant in the prior
solicitation, other than the insurer, as soon as reasonably practicable after
the commencement of the solicitation in opposition thereto.

(d) If, subsequent to the filing of the
statements required by subsections (a), (b), and (c), additional persons become
participants in a solicitation, there shall be filed with the commissioner, by
or on behalf of each person, a statement in duplicate containing the
information specified in schedule B under section 431:4-233, within three
business days after the person becomes a participant, or longer period as the
commissioner may authorize upon a showing of good cause.

(e) If any material change occurs in the facts
reported in any statement filed by or on behalf of any participant, an
appropriate amendment to the statement shall be filed within three business
days by or on behalf of each respective participant with the commissioner.

(f) Each statement and amendment thereto filed
pursuant to this section shall be part of the public files of the commissioner.
[L 2000, c 24, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next